src/fst/morphology/incoming/content.lexd
: a gád-ágad <@P.LEX.agád-ágad0@> <@R.LEX.agád-ágad0@>  # Freq !{agád-ágad}
: a ́g-ag <@P.LEX.ág-ag0@> <@R.LEX.ág-ag0@>  # To separate !{ág-ag}
: a gahán <@P.LEX.agahán0@> <@R.LEX.agahán0@>  # Morning tuba or palm-wine collected from the coconut-palms in the morning !{agahán}
: a gák <@P.LEX.agák0@> <@R.LEX.agák0@>  # Cock !{agák}
: a ́gak <@P.LEX.ágak0@> <@R.LEX.ágak0@>  # To support !{ágak}
: a gálon <@P.LEX.agálon0@> <@R.LEX.agálon0@>  # Lord !{agálon}
: a gám <@P.LEX.agám0@> <@R.LEX.agám0@>  # To cope with !{agám}
: a ́gao <@P.LEX.ágao0@> <@R.LEX.ágao0@>  # To seize !{ágao}
: a ́gao <@P.LEX.ágao1@> <@R.LEX.ágao1@>  # Prepossessing !{ágao}
: a ́gap <@P.LEX.ágap0@> <@R.LEX.ágap0@>  # To cope with !{ágap}
: a gáp <@P.LEX.agáp0@> <@R.LEX.agáp0@>  # To rise early !{agáp}
: a gás <@P.LEX.agás0@> <@R.LEX.agás0@>  # Petroleum !{agás}
: a ́gas <@P.LEX.ágas0@> <@R.LEX.ágas0@>  # To close !{ágas}
: a gás-agás <@P.LEX.agás-agás0@> <@R.LEX.agás-agás0@>  # A kind of grasshopper !{agás-agás}
: a gás-ágas <@P.LEX.agás-ágas0@> <@R.LEX.agás-ágas0@>  # Dim !{agás-ágas}
: a ́gaw <@P.LEX.ágaw0@> <@R.LEX.ágaw0@>  # See ágao !{ágaw}
: a gáw-agawón <@P.LEX.agáw-agawón0@> <@R.LEX.agáw-agawón0@>  # What is to be or should be snatched from or saved at once !{agáw-agawón}
: a ́gay <@P.LEX.ágay0@> <@R.LEX.ágay0@>  # To trickle !{ágay}
: a gáy-ay <@P.LEX.agáy-ay0@> <@R.LEX.agáy-ay0@>  # Decomposition !{agáy-ay}
: a ́gba%^K <@P.LEX.ágba%^K0@> <@R.LEX.ágba%^K0@>  # Dumb !{ágbà}
: a ́gbat <@P.LEX.ágbat0@> <@R.LEX.ágbat0@>  # To follow !{ágbat}
: a ́gbay <@P.LEX.ágbay0@> <@R.LEX.ágbay0@>  # To put one’s arms on or round another’s shoulder !{ágbay}
: a ́gbon <@P.LEX.ágbon0@> <@R.LEX.ágbon0@>  # (H) Fine ashes !{ágbon}
: a ́gboy <@P.LEX.ágboy0@> <@R.LEX.ágboy0@>  # A kind of tree with leaves spotted with green and white !{ágboy}
: a ́gda <@P.LEX.ágda0@> <@R.LEX.ágda0@>  # To invite !{ágda}
: a ́gday <@P.LEX.ágday0@> <@R.LEX.ágday0@>  # Slowness !{ágday}
: a gdayán <@P.LEX.agdayán0@> <@R.LEX.agdayán0@>  # Slow !{agdayán}
: a ́gdom <@P.LEX.ágdom0@> <@R.LEX.ágdom0@>  # A kind of shrub with rather dark leaves !{ágdom}
: a géu <@P.LEX.agéu0@> <@R.LEX.agéu0@>  #  !{agéu, ágeu}
: a géw <@P.LEX.agéw0@> <@R.LEX.agéw0@>  # See agéu !{agéw, ágew}
: a ́gho%^K <@P.LEX.ágho%^K0@> <@R.LEX.ágho%^K0@>  # A small tree much used for fences !{ághò}
: a ́ghon <@P.LEX.ághon0@> <@R.LEX.ághon0@>  # Compass !{ághon}
: a gí%^K <@P.LEX.agí%^K0@> <@R.LEX.agí%^K0@>  # Soft !{agî}
: a ́gi <@P.LEX.ági0@> <@R.LEX.ági0@>  # Passage !{ági}
: a gí-ági <@P.LEX.agí-ági0@> <@R.LEX.agí-ági0@>  # Passing !{agí-ági}
: a gí-ági%^K <@P.LEX.agí-ági%^K0@> <@R.LEX.agí-ági%^K0@>  # Dim !{agî-ágì}
: a gí-agión <@P.LEX.agí-agión0@> <@R.LEX.agí-agión0@>  # See the foregoing agî-ágì !{agî-agión}
: a gíd-ágid <@P.LEX.agíd-ágid0@> <@R.LEX.agíd-ágid0@>  # Similar !{agíd-ágid}
: a gigísing <@P.LEX.agigísing0@> <@R.LEX.agigísing0@>  # The temple !{agigísing}
: a gíhis <@P.LEX.agíhis0@> <@R.LEX.agíhis0@>  # A kind of small shell-fish !{agíhis}
: a ́gila <@P.LEX.ágila0@> <@R.LEX.ágila0@>  # (Sp. águila) Eagle !{ágila}
: a gíl-agíl <@P.LEX.agíl-agíl0@> <@R.LEX.agíl-agíl0@>  # Stunted in growth !{agíl-agíl}
: a gíl-agilón <@P.LEX.agíl-agilón0@> <@R.LEX.agíl-agilón0@>  # Stunted !{agíl-agilón}
: a gináldo <@P.LEX.agináldo0@> <@R.LEX.agináldo0@>  # (Sp. aguinaldo) Christmas box !{agináldo}
: a gipó <@P.LEX.agipó0@> <@R.LEX.agipó0@>  # A firebrand !{agipó}
: a gíron <@P.LEX.agíron0@> <@R.LEX.agíron0@>  # A kind of tall grass with sharp-edged blades !{agíron}
: a gís-is <@P.LEX.agís-is0@> <@R.LEX.agís-is0@>  # The mange !{agís-is}
: a gis-isón <@P.LEX.agis-isón0@> <@R.LEX.agis-isón0@>  # Mangy !{agis-isón}
: a gísod <@P.LEX.agísod0@> <@R.LEX.agísod0@>  # To follow one after another !{agísod}
: a ́glot <@P.LEX.áglot0@> <@R.LEX.áglot0@>  # A harsh sound of creaking or grating !{áglot}
: a gnáya <@P.LEX.agnáya0@> <@R.LEX.agnáya0@>  # A kind of vine and its stem used for binding purposes and wickerwork !{agnáya}
: a gogóling <@P.LEX.agogóling0@> <@R.LEX.agogóling0@>  # The humble-bee or bumble-bee !{agogóling}
: a góho <@P.LEX.agóho0@> <@R.LEX.agóho0@>  # A kind of tree !{agóho}
b a ́nda <@P.LEX.bánda0@> <@R.LEX.bánda0@>  # (Sp. banda) Band !{bánda}
b a ndéha <@P.LEX.bandéha0@> <@R.LEX.bandéha0@>  # (Sp. bandeja) Waiter !{bandéha}
b a ndehádo <@P.LEX.bandehádo0@> <@R.LEX.bandehádo0@>  # (A Philippine derivative from bandéha) !{bandehádo}
b a ndéra <@P.LEX.bandéra0@> <@R.LEX.bandéra0@>  # (Sp. bandera) Banner !{bandéra}
b a ́ndi <@P.LEX.bándi0@> <@R.LEX.bándi0@>  # A kind of candy (sweet) made of unrefined sugar and shreds of coconut meat or peanuts !{bándi}
b a ́ndi%^K <@P.LEX.bándi%^K0@> <@R.LEX.bándi%^K0@>  # A small !{bándì}
b a ́ndo <@P.LEX.bándo0@> <@R.LEX.bándo0@>  # (Sp. bando) Notice !{bándo}
b a ́ndog <@P.LEX.bándog0@> <@R.LEX.bándog0@>  # (B) To stir !{bándog}
b a ndoléro <@P.LEX.bandoléro0@> <@R.LEX.bandoléro0@>  # (Sp. bandolero—​highwayman) Town-crier !{bandoléro}
b a nduríya <@P.LEX.banduríya0@> <@R.LEX.banduríya0@>  # (Sp. bandurria) Bandurria !{banduríya}
b a ngá%^K <@P.LEX.bangá%^K0@> <@R.LEX.bangá%^K0@>  # An earthen water-pot !{bangâ}
b a ngá <@P.LEX.bangá0@> <@R.LEX.bangá0@>  # To like !{bangá}
b a ngá%^K <@P.LEX.bangá%^K1@> <@R.LEX.bangá%^K1@>  # An idiot !{bangâ}
b a ́ngag <@P.LEX.bángag0@> <@R.LEX.bángag0@>  # To crack !{bángag}
b a ngág <@P.LEX.bangág0@> <@R.LEX.bangág0@>  # Cracked !{bangág}
b a ngál <@P.LEX.bangál0@> <@R.LEX.bangál0@>  # A handful !{bangál}
b a ́ngan <@P.LEX.bángan0@> <@R.LEX.bángan0@>  # To ambush !{bángan}
b a ́ng-aw <@P.LEX.báng-aw0@> <@R.LEX.báng-aw0@>  # To become stale !{báng-aw}
b a ́ngbang <@P.LEX.bángbang0@> <@R.LEX.bángbang0@>  # To widen by digging !{bángbang}
b a ́ngdan <@P.LEX.bángdan0@> <@R.LEX.bángdan0@>  # Cause !{bángdan}
b a ́ngday <@P.LEX.bángday0@> <@R.LEX.bángday0@>  # To lie one above or across another in irregular fashion !{bángday}
b a ́ngga%^K <@P.LEX.bángga%^K0@> <@R.LEX.bángga%^K0@>  # The part between the kitchen and house in Philippine houses !{bánggà}
b a ́ngga%^K <@P.LEX.bángga%^K1@> <@R.LEX.bángga%^K1@>  # To ambush !{bánggà}
b a ́nggad <@P.LEX.bánggad0@> <@R.LEX.bánggad0@>  # to accustom !{bánggad}
b a ́nggan <@P.LEX.bánggan0@> <@R.LEX.bánggan0@>  # For banogán from banóg—​to swell !{bánggan}
b a ́nggi%^K <@P.LEX.bánggi%^K0@> <@R.LEX.bánggi%^K0@>  # To break or tear off a branch at its juncture with the main stem or tree !{bánggì}
b a nggiánay <@P.LEX.banggiánay0@> <@R.LEX.banggiánay0@>  # To quarrel !{banggiánay}
b a ́nggit <@P.LEX.bánggit0@> <@R.LEX.bánggit0@>  # To disagree !{bánggit}
b a ́nggos <@P.LEX.bánggos0@> <@R.LEX.bánggos0@>  # To rub rather hard with a stone or the like !{bánggos}
b a ngí%^K <@P.LEX.bangí%^K0@> <@R.LEX.bangí%^K0@>  # The other— !{bangî}
b a ngí%^K <@P.LEX.bangí%^K1@> <@R.LEX.bangí%^K1@>  # To do a thing with only one hand !{bangî}
b a nngí%^K <@P.LEX.banngí%^K0@> <@R.LEX.banngí%^K0@>  # To change from side to side !{banngî, -bángì}
b a ngí%^K <@P.LEX.bangí%^K2@> <@R.LEX.bangí%^K2@>  # The fiddler-crab !{bangî, -bangî}
b a ́ngig <@P.LEX.bángig0@> <@R.LEX.bángig0@>  # Quarrelling !{bángig}
b a ngíg-bángig <@P.LEX.bangíg-bángig0@> <@R.LEX.bangíg-bángig0@>  # Dim !{bangíg-bángig}
b a ́ngil <@P.LEX.bángil0@> <@R.LEX.bángil0@>  # To prop !{bángil}
b a ngíl <@P.LEX.bangíl0@> <@R.LEX.bangíl0@>  # A prop or wedge for the operation called “bángil” !{bangíl}
b a ngilíd <@P.LEX.bangilíd0@> <@R.LEX.bangilíd0@>  # Slope !{bangilíd, bangílid}
b a ngirít <@P.LEX.bangirít0@> <@R.LEX.bangirít0@>  # To grin !{bangirít}
b a ngís <@P.LEX.bangís0@> <@R.LEX.bangís0@>  # Fierceness !{bangís}
b a ́ngka <@P.LEX.bángka0@> <@R.LEX.bángka0@>  # Satiety !{bángka}
b a ́ngkag <@P.LEX.bángkag0@> <@R.LEX.bángkag0@>  # Bulky !{bángkag}
b a ́ngkal <@P.LEX.bángkal0@> <@R.LEX.bángkal0@>  # A kind of tree and its timber of a yellowish colour !{bángkal}
b a ́ngkat <@P.LEX.bángkat0@> <@R.LEX.bángkat0@>  # A kind of open-work basket used for stowing away table-ware !{bángkat}
b a ́ngkaw <@P.LEX.bángkaw0@> <@R.LEX.bángkaw0@>  # A lance !{bángkaw}
b a ngkáw-bángkaw <@P.LEX.bangkáw-bángkaw0@> <@R.LEX.bangkáw-bángkaw0@>  # A kind of dragon-fly !{bangkáw-bángkaw}
b a ́ngkay <@P.LEX.bángkay0@> <@R.LEX.bángkay0@>  # A corpse !{bángkay}
b a ́ngkil <@P.LEX.bángkil0@> <@R.LEX.bángkil0@>  # Eye-tooth !{bángkil}
b a ngkílan <@P.LEX.bangkílan0@> <@R.LEX.bangkílan0@>  # Possessing tusks !{bangkílan}
b a ngkilíng <@P.LEX.bangkilíng0@> <@R.LEX.bangkilíng0@>  # A kind of tree with edible fruit !{bangkilíng}
b a ́ngkit <@P.LEX.bángkit0@> <@R.LEX.bángkit0@>  # To nibble !{bángkit}
b a ́ngko%^K <@P.LEX.bángko%^K0@> <@R.LEX.bángko%^K0@>  # See bánkò !{bángkò, bángko}
b a ́ngkong <@P.LEX.bángkong0@> <@R.LEX.bángkong0@>  # Curved !{bángkong}
b a ́nglad <@P.LEX.bánglad0@> <@R.LEX.bánglad0@>  # A kind of shrub !{bánglad}
b a ́nglid <@P.LEX.bánglid0@> <@R.LEX.bánglid0@>  # A slope !{bánglid}
b a ́nglo%^K <@P.LEX.bánglo%^K0@> <@R.LEX.bánglo%^K0@>  # The fibre of buri-leaves used for making mats !{bánglò}
b a ́ngog <@P.LEX.bángog0@> <@R.LEX.bángog0@>  # Head !{bángog}
b a ́ng-og <@P.LEX.báng-og0@> <@R.LEX.báng-og0@>  # Decomposition !{báng-og}
b a ́ngol <@P.LEX.bángol0@> <@R.LEX.bángol0@>  # Very tall !{bángol}
b a ́ngon <@P.LEX.bángon0@> <@R.LEX.bángon0@>  # To rise !{bángon}
b a ngón <@P.LEX.bangón0@> <@R.LEX.bangón0@>  # The principal external abdominal blood-vessels !{bangón}
b a ngón-bángon <@P.LEX.bangón-bángon0@> <@R.LEX.bangón-bángon0@>  # A cart-pole !{bangón-bángon}
b a ́ngot <@P.LEX.bángot0@> <@R.LEX.bángot0@>  # To tie !{bángot}
b a ngót <@P.LEX.bangót0@> <@R.LEX.bangót0@>  # Any rope or string-like material used for binding or tying !{bangót}
b a ́ngrus <@P.LEX.bángrus0@> <@R.LEX.bángrus0@>  # A kind of fish growing to about a foot in length and much esteemed as food !{bángrus}
b a ́ngrus <@P.LEX.bángrus1@> <@R.LEX.bángrus1@>  # To rub !{bángrus}
b a ́ngtan <@P.LEX.bángtan0@> <@R.LEX.bángtan0@>  # etc !{bángtan}
b a ́ngto%^K <@P.LEX.bángto%^K0@> <@R.LEX.bángto%^K0@>  # A kind of bamboo without thorns !{bángtò}
b a ́ngto <@P.LEX.bángto0@> <@R.LEX.bángto0@>  # A small piece !{bángto}
b a ngúd <@P.LEX.bangúd0@> <@R.LEX.bangúd0@>  # Reason !{bangúd}
b a ngúd <@P.LEX.bangúd1@> <@R.LEX.bangúd1@>  # On account of !{bangúd}
b a ́nhaw <@P.LEX.bánhaw0@> <@R.LEX.bánhaw0@>  # To rise from the dead !{bánhaw}
b a ́nhay <@P.LEX.bánhay0@> <@R.LEX.bánhay0@>  # A rise in the ground !{bánhay}
b a ́nhog <@P.LEX.bánhog0@> <@R.LEX.bánhog0@>  # To get loose or lose connection with !{bánhog}
b a ́nhot <@P.LEX.bánhot0@> <@R.LEX.bánhot0@>  # A kind of shrub whose strong-fibred bark is much employed in the making of ropes !{bánhot}
b a níg <@P.LEX.baníg0@> <@R.LEX.baníg0@>  # A mat for a bed !{baníg}
b a níg <@P.LEX.baníg1@> <@R.LEX.baníg1@>  # To be plentiful !{baníg}
b a nihót <@P.LEX.banihót0@> <@R.LEX.banihót0@>  # Careless and negligent in the execution of orders !{banihót}
b a níklan <@P.LEX.baníklan0@> <@R.LEX.baníklan0@>  # (B) A piece of split bamboo or wood !{baníklan}
b a nílad <@P.LEX.banílad0@> <@R.LEX.banílad0@>  # To spread !{banílad}
b a ni-ól <@P.LEX.bani-ól0@> <@R.LEX.bani-ól0@>  # (B) To jam !{bani-ól}
b a níslak <@P.LEX.baníslak0@> <@R.LEX.baníslak0@>  # (B) Splint !{baníslak}
b a ́nka <@P.LEX.bánka0@> <@R.LEX.bánka0@>  # (Sp. banca) A kind of boat !{bánka}
b a ́nkil <@P.LEX.bánkil0@> <@R.LEX.bánkil0@>  # Tusk !{bánkil}
b a nkíte <@P.LEX.bankíte0@> <@R.LEX.bankíte0@>  # (Sp. banquete) Banquet !{bankíte}
b a nkíya <@P.LEX.bankíya0@> <@R.LEX.bankíya0@>  # (Probably from the Sp. banca) !{bankíya}
